Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2015.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sergeant Edward Vernon McChessney Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Edward Vernon McChessney was born January 21, 1930, in Altoona.(2) Sergeant McChessney graduated from Altoona High School in 1947 after completing the plumbing and welding program.(3) Sergeant McChessney was one of 17 children and, in 1930, resided with his sister, Geraldine Shadle, at the home of their grandparents, William and Ida Edwards Shadle, in Huston Township, Blair County.(4) Sergeant McChessney served in the United States Air 12345678910111213141516171819 Force during the Korean War, attaining the rank of sergeant in the 5th Bomb Squadron, stationed at Travis Air Force Base in Fairfield, California.(5) Sergeant McChessney died on March 28, 1952, in Fort Wayne, Indiana, as the result of an automobile accident while returning to base after visiting his parents.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 5662, carrying Pennsylvania Route 866 over the Frankstown Branch of the Juniata River in Catharine Township, Blair County, is designated as the Sergeant Edward Vernon McChessney Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2015PN2569 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516